New York, session 2025-2026, S1864.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Subdivision (a) of section 1115 of the tax law is amended 2 by adding a new paragraph 47 to read as follows: 3 (47) Any purchase made by a civic association which is used or 4 intended to be used in such civic association's course of business. For 5 purposes of this paragraph, "civic association" means a voluntary group 6 of community members who work together to address common concerns, 7 improve their neighborhood, and enhance the quality of life for resi- 8 dents by engaging in activities such as but not limited to advocating 9 for local issues, organizing community events, and collaborating with 10 government officials. 11 § 2. This act shall take effect on the first day of the sales tax 12 quarterly period, as described in subdivision (b) of section 1136 of the 13 tax law, next commencing at least 90 days after this act shall have 14 become a law and shall apply in accordance with the applicable transi- 15 tional provisions of sections 1106 and 1217 of the tax law. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD04207-01-5